test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_kissa_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - tikká:
    tikká+N+Sg+Nom:  tikká
    tikká+N+Sg+Gen:  tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Acc:  tiká
    tikká+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikká+N+Sg+Loc:  tikkáást
    tikká+N+Sg+Com:  tikkáin
    tikká+N+Sg+Abe:  tikáttáá
    tikká+N+Ess:  tikkán
    tikká+N+Par:  tikkád
    tikká+N+Pl+Nom:  tikáh
    tikká+N+Pl+Gen:  tikái
    tikká+N+Pl+Acc:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Ill:  tikkáid
    tikká+N+Pl+Loc:  tikáin
    tikká+N+Pl+Com:  [tikáiguin, tikáigijn]
    tikká+N+Pl+Abe:  tikáittáá

  Noun - sivlá:
    sivlá+N+Sg+Nom:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Gen:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Acc:  sivlá
    sivlá+N+Sg+Ill:  siivlán
    sivlá+N+Sg+Loc:  sivláást
    sivlá+N+Sg+Com:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Sg+Abe:  sivláttáá
    sivlá+N+Ess:  sivlán
    sivlá+N+Par:  sivlád
    sivlá+N+Pl+Nom:  sivláh
    sivlá+N+Pl+Gen: sivlái
    sivlá+N+Pl+Acc:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Ill:  sivláid
    sivlá+N+Pl+Loc:  sivláin
    sivlá+N+Pl+Com:  [sivláiguin, sivláigijn]
    sivlá+N+Pl+Abe:  sivláittáá

  Noun - nollá:
    nollá+N+Sg+Nom:  nollá
    nollá+N+Sg+Gen:  nolá
    nollá+N+Sg+Acc:  nolá
    nollá+N+Sg+Ill:  noolán
    nollá+N+Sg+Loc:  nolláást
    nollá+N+Sg+Com:  nolláin
    nollá+N+Sg+Abe:  noláttáá
    nollá+N+Ess:  nollán
    nollá+N+Par:  nollád
    nollá+N+Pl+Nom:  noláh
    nollá+N+Pl+Gen:  nolái
    nollá+N+Pl+Acc:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Ill:  nolláid
    nollá+N+Pl+Loc:  noláin
    nollá+N+Pl+Com:  [noláiguin, noláigijn]
    nollá+N+Pl+Abe:  noláittáá

  Noun - rottá:
    rottá+N+Sg+Nom:  rottá
    rottá+N+Sg+Gen:  rotá
    rottá+N+Sg+Acc:  rotá
    rottá+N+Sg+Ill:  rootán
    rottá+N+Sg+Loc:  rottáást
    rottá+N+Sg+Com:  rottáin
    rottá+N+Sg+Abe:  rotáttáá
    rottá+N+Ess:  rottán
    rottá+N+Par:  rottád
    rottá+N+Pl+Nom:  rotáh
    rottá+N+Pl+Gen:  rotái
    rottá+N+Pl+Acc:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Ill:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Loc:  rotáin
    rottá+N+Pl+Com:  [rotáiguin, rotáigijn]
    rottá+N+Pl+Abe:  rotáittáá

  Noun - rullá:
    rullá+N+Sg+Nom:  rullá
    rullá+N+Sg+Gen:  rulá
    rullá+N+Sg+Acc:  rulá
    rullá+N+Sg+Ill:  ruulán
    rullá+N+Sg+Loc:  rulláást
    rullá+N+Sg+Com:  rulláin
    rullá+N+Sg+Abe:  ruláttáá
    rullá+N+Ess:  rullán
    rullá+N+Par:  rullád
    rullá+N+Pl+Nom:  ruláh
    rullá+N+Pl+Gen:  rulái
    rullá+N+Pl+Acc:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Ill:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Loc:  ruláin
    rullá+N+Pl+Com:  [ruláiguin, ruláigijn]
    rullá+N+Pl+Abe:  ruláittáá

  Noun - kukká:
    kukká+N+Sg+Nom:  kukká
    kukká+N+Sg+Gen:  kuká
    kukká+N+Sg+Acc:  kuká
    kukká+N+Sg+Ill:  kuukán
    kukká+N+Sg+Loc:  kukkáást
    kukká+N+Sg+Com:  kukkáin
    kukká+N+Sg+Abe:  kukáttáá
    kukká+N+Ess: kukkán
    kukká+N+Par: kukkád
    kukká+N+Pl+Nom:  kukáh
    kukká+N+Pl+Gen:  kukái
    kukká+N+Pl+Acc:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Ill:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Loc:  kukáin
    kukká+N+Pl+Com:  [kukáiguin, kukáigijn]
    kukká+N+Pl+Abe:  kukáittáá

  Noun - sohvá:
    sohvá+N+Sg+Nom:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Gen:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Acc: sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Ill:  soohván
    sohvá+N+Sg+Loc:  sohváást
    sohvá+N+Sg+Com:  sohváin
    sohvá+N+Sg+Abe:  sohváttáá
    sohvá+N+Ess:  sohván
    sohvá+N+Par:  sohvád
    sohvá+N+Pl+Nom:  sohváh
    sohvá+N+Pl+Gen:  sohvái
    sohvá+N+Pl+Acc:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Ill:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Loc:  sohváin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Com:  [sohváiguin, sohváigijn]
    sohvá+N+Pl+Abe:  sohváittáá

  Noun - rovvá:
    rovvá+N+Sg+Nom:  rovvá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Gen:  rová
    rovvá+N+Sg+Acc:  rová
    rovvá+N+Sg+Ill:  roován
    rovvá+N+Sg+Loc:  rovváást
    rovvá+N+Sg+Com:  rovváin
    rovvá+N+Sg+Abe:  rováttáá
    rovvá+N+Ess:  rovván
    rovvá+N+Par:  rovvád
    rovvá+N+Pl+Nom:  rováh
    rovvá+N+Pl+Gen:  rovái
    rovvá+N+Pl+Acc:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Ill:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Loc:  rováin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Com:  [rováiguin, rováigijn]
    rovvá+N+Pl+Abe:  rováittáá

  Noun - sukká:
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom:  sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen:  suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc:  suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill:  suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc:  suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com:  suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe:  suháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess:  sukkán
    sukká+N+Par:  sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom:  suháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen:  suhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc:  suháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com:  [suháiguin, suháigijn]
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe:  suháittáá

  Noun - juŋkká:
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Nom:  juŋkká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Gen:  juŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Acc:  juŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Ill:  juuŋkán
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Loc:  juŋkkáást
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Com:  juŋkkáin
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Abe:  juŋkáttáá
    juŋkká+N+Ess:  juŋkkán
    juŋkká+N+Par:  juŋkkád
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Nom:  juŋkáh
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Gen:  juŋkái
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Acc:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Ill:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Loc:  juŋkáin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Com:  [juŋkáiguin, juŋkáigijn]
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Abe:  juŋkáittáá

  Noun - tuvvá:
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Nom:  tuvvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Gen:  tuvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Acc:  tuvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Ill:  tuuván
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Loc:  tuvváást
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Com:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Abe:  tuváttáá
    tuvvá+N+Ess:  tuvván
    tuvvá+N+Par:  tuvvád
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Nom:  tuváh
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Gen:  tuvái
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Acc:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Ill:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Loc:  tuváin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Com:  [tuváiguin, tuváigijn]
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Abe:  tuváittáá

  Noun - kámppá:
    kámppá+N+Sg+Nom:  kámppá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Gen:  kámpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Acc:  kámpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Ill:  káámpán
    kámppá+N+Sg+Loc:  kámppáást
    kámppá+N+Sg+Com:  kámppáin
    kámppá+N+Sg+Abe:  kámpáttáá
    kámppá+N+Ess:  kámppán
    kámppá+N+Par: kámppád
    kámppá+N+Pl+Nom:  kámpáh
    kámppá+N+Pl+Gen:  kámpái
    kámppá+N+Pl+Acc:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Ill:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Loc:  kámpáin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Com:  [kámpáiguin, kámpáigijn]
    kámppá+N+Pl+Abe:  kámpáittáá

  Noun - hommá:
    hommá+N+Sg+Nom:  hommá
    hommá+N+Sg+Gen:  homá
    hommá+N+Sg+Acc:  homá
    hommá+N+Sg+Ill:  hoomán
    hommá+N+Sg+Loc:  hommáást
    hommá+N+Sg+Com:  hommáin
    hommá+N+Sg+Abe:  homáttáá
    hommá+N+Ess:  hommán
    hommá+N+Par: hommád
    hommá+N+Pl+Nom:  homáh
    hommá+N+Pl+Gen:  homái
    hommá+N+Pl+Acc:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Ill:  hommáid
    hommá+N+Pl+Loc:  homáin
    hommá+N+Pl+Com:  [homáiguin, homáigijn]
    hommá+N+Pl+Abe:  homáittáá

  Noun - torppá:
    torppá+N+Sg+Nom:  torppá
    torppá+N+Sg+Gen:  torpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Acc:  torpá
    torppá+N+Sg+Ill:  toorpán
    torppá+N+Sg+Loc:  torppáást
    torppá+N+Sg+Com:  torppáin
    torppá+N+Sg+Abe:  torpáttáá
    torppá+N+Ess:  torppán
    torppá+N+Par: torppád
    torppá+N+Pl+Nom:  torpáh
    torppá+N+Pl+Gen:  torpái
    torppá+N+Pl+Acc:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Ill:  torppáid
    torppá+N+Pl+Loc:  torpáin
    torppá+N+Pl+Com:  [torpáiguin, torpáigijn]
    torppá+N+Pl+Abe:  torpáittáá

  Noun - kárttá:
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  kárttá
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  kártá
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Acc: kártá
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  káártán
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  kárttáást
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Com:  kárttáin
    kárttá+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  kártáttáá
    kárttá+v1+N+Ess:  kárttán
    kárttá+v1+N+Par: kárttád
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  kártáh
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Gen:  kártái
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  kárttáid
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  kárttáid
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  kártáin
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [kártáiguin, kártáigijn]
    kárttá+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  kártáittáá

  Noun - liššá:
    liššá+N+Sg+Nom:  liššá
    liššá+N+Sg+Gen:  lišá
    liššá+N+Sg+Acc:  lišá
    liššá+N+Sg+Ill:  liišán
    liššá+N+Sg+Loc:  liššáást
    liššá+N+Sg+Com:  liššáin
    liššá+N+Sg+Abe:  lišáttáá
    liššá+N+Ess:  liššán
    liššá+N+Par: liššád
    liššá+N+Pl+Nom:  lišáh
    liššá+N+Pl+Gen:  lišái
    liššá+N+Pl+Acc:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Ill:  liššáid
    liššá+N+Pl+Loc:  lišáin
    liššá+N+Pl+Com:  [lišáiguin, lišáigijn]
    liššá+N+Pl+Abe:  lišáittáá


  Noun - vársá:
    vársá+N+Sg+Nom:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Gen:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Acc: vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Ill:  váársán
    vársá+N+Sg+Loc:  vársáást
    vársá+N+Sg+Com:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Sg+Abe:  vársáttáá
    vársá+N+Ess:  vársán
    vársá+N+Par: vársád
    vársá+N+Pl+Nom:  vársáh
    vársá+N+Pl+Gen:  vársái
    vársá+N+Pl+Acc:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Ill:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Loc:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Pl+Com:  [vársáiguin, vársáigijn]
    vársá+N+Pl+Abe:  vársáittáá

  Noun - urná:
    urná+N+Sg+Nom:  urná # removed from fadda to alge and further to kissa
    urná+N+Sg+Gen:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Acc:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Ill:  uurnán
    urná+N+Sg+Loc:  urnáást
    urná+N+Sg+Com:  urnáin
    urná+N+Sg+Abe:  urnáttáá
    urná+N+Ess:  urnán
    urná+N+Par: urnád
    urná+N+Pl+Nom:  urnáh
    urná+N+Pl+Gen:  urnái
    urná+N+Pl+Acc:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Ill:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Loc:  urnáin
    urná+N+Pl+Com:  [urnáiguin, urnáigijn]
    urná+N+Pl+Abe:  urnáittáá

  Noun - hillo:
    hillo+N+Sg+Nom:  hillo
    hillo+N+Sg+Gen:  hilo
    hillo+N+Sg+Acc:  hilo
    hillo+N+Sg+Ill:  hiilon
    hillo+N+Sg+Loc:  hilloost
    hillo+N+Sg+Com:  hilloin
    hillo+N+Sg+Abe:  hilottáá
    hillo+N+Ess:  hillon
    hillo+N+Par:  hillod
    hillo+N+Pl+Nom:  hiloh
    hillo+N+Pl+Gen:  hiloi
    hillo+N+Pl+Acc:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Ill:  hilloid
    hillo+N+Pl+Loc:  hiloin
    hillo+N+Pl+Com:  [hiloiguin, hiloigijn]
    hillo+N+Pl+Abe:  hiloittáá

  Noun - millo: # o-stems
    millo+N+Sg+Nom: millo
    millo+N+Sg+Gen: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Acc: milo
    millo+N+Sg+Ill: miilon
    millo+N+Sg+Loc: milloost
    millo+N+Sg+Com: milloin
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: milottáá
    millo+N+Ess:    millon
    millo+N+Par:    millod
    millo+N+Pl+Nom: miloh
    millo+N+Pl+Gen: miloi
    millo+N+Pl+Acc: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Ill: milloid
    millo+N+Pl+Loc: miloin
    millo+N+Pl+Com: [miloiguin, miloigijn]
    millo+N+Pl+Abe: miloittáá

  Noun - taŋgo: 
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  taaŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  taŋgoost
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  taŋgottáá
    taŋgo+N+Ess:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Par:  taŋgod
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  taŋgoh
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  taŋgoi
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  [taŋgoiguin, taŋgoigijn]
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  taŋgoittáá
